Tennessee statutes. Title 62 Professions, Businesses and Trades
Part 2

Real Estate Appraiser Commission

62-39-201. Creation — Composition.

There is created an independent real estate appraiser commission under the division of regulatory boards in the department of commerce and insurance, whose duty shall be to administer and enforce this chapter.

The commission shall consist of nine (9) members, one (1) of whom shall be a public member, one (1) of whom shall be a full-time educator of appraisal-related education with the state's universities, colleges and junior colleges, and one (1) of whom shall be from an appraisal management company or financial institution providing appraisal services in Tennessee.

Six (6) of the members shall be real estate appraisers.

No more than three (3) commission members may be from any one (1) grand division of the state.

The governor shall appoint the members of the real estate appraiser commission. In making appointments to the commission, the governor shall strive to ensure that at least two (2) persons serving on the commission are sixty (60) years of age or older and that at least two (2) persons serving on the commission are members of a racial minority. The governor shall strive to appoint to the commission no more than two (2) members of any one (1) appraiser organization.

Each of the real estate appraiser members first appointed to the commission shall possess a minimum of ten (10) years of active experience as a real estate appraiser.

Each real estate appraiser member of the commission appointed must be a state certified real estate appraiser or a state licensed real estate appraiser. The governor, in making appointments, shall strive to achieve a balance between certified general, certified residential and licensed appraisers.

The governor shall make initial appointments of three (3) members for terms of one (1) year, three (3) members for terms of two (2) years, and three (3) members for terms of three (3) years. Thereafter, all members shall be appointed for terms of three (3) years.

Upon expiration of their terms, members of the commission shall continue to hold office until the appointment and qualification of their successors. No person shall serve as a member of the commission for more than two (2) consecutive terms. The governor may remove a member for cause.

The public members of the commission shall not be engaged in the practice of real estate appraising.

Acts 1990, ch. 865, § 7; 1991, ch. 366, §§ 7-9; 1992, ch. 697, § 1; 2006, ch. 598, § 1; 2010, ch. 963, § 28.

Compiler's Notes. The real estate appraiser commission, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2024. See §§ 4-29-112, 4-29-245.

Acts 2010, ch. 963, § 29 provided that: “(a) For purposes of making appointments to meet the revised board composition provided for in § 62-39-201(a)(2), appointments to fill vacant positions shall be made as follows:

“(1) First, a person from a qualified appraisal management company or financial institution providing appraisal services in Tennessee;

“(2) Second, a person who is public member;

“(3) Thereafter, qualified appraisers.

“(b) This Act shall not affect the terms of the current members of the commission, but all appointments after July 1, 2011, shall be made so as to meet the requirements established in Section 28 [§ 62-39-201(a)(2)], as terms expire and vacancies occur.”

Cross-References. Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

62-39-202. Meetings — Compensation.

The commission shall meet at least three (3) times each year to conduct its business. Places of future meetings shall be decided by the vote of members at meetings. Written notice shall be given to each member of the time and place of each meeting of the commission at least ten (10) days before the scheduled date of the meetings.

The members of the commission shall elect a chair from among the members to preside at commission meetings.

A majority of the commission shall constitute a quorum. A majority of the members present for a quorum shall be appraiser members.

Each member of the commission shall be entitled to a per diem allowance of fifty dollars ($50.00) for each meeting of the commission at which the member is present and for each day or substantial part of a day actually spent in the conduct of the business of the commission. In addition, members shall receive actual expenses to be paid in accordance with the comprehensive travel regulations promulgated by the commissioner of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

The commission at its organizational meeting shall appoint a subcommittee whose duties will be to work with the state's universities, colleges and junior colleges to implement a statewide educational network of appraisal courses leading to an associate or baccalaureate, or both, of applied science degree in real estate appraisal.

Acts 1990, ch. 865, § 7.

62-39-203. Rules and regulations.

The commission shall adopt rules and regulations in aid or in furtherance of this chapter.

Acts 1990, ch. 865, § 8.

62-39-204. Powers and duties.

The commission has the power and duty to:

Further define by regulation, for state licensed appraisers and with respect to each category of state certified real estate appraiser, the type of educational experience, appraisal experience and equivalent experience that will meet the statutory requirements of this chapter;

Establish the examination specifications for state licensed appraisers and for each category of state certified real estate appraiser, to provide or procure appropriate examination questions and answers and to establish procedures for grading examinations;

Solicit bids and enter into contracts with one (1) or more educational testing services or organizations for the preparation of a bank of questions and answers for licensing and certification examinations that meet the examination specifications adopted from time to time by the commission;

Approve licensing and certification examinations, based upon the bank of questions and answers and the question selection process approved by the commission, in places and at times that may be required to carry out its responsibilities under this chapter;

Approve or disapprove applications for licenses and certification and issue real estate appraisal licenses and certificates;

Further define by regulation, for state licensed appraisers and with respect to each category of state licensed and certified real estate appraiser, the continuing education requirements for the renewal of certification that will meet the statutory requirements provided in this chapter;

Review from time to time the standards for the development and communication of real estate appraisals provided in this chapter and to adopt regulations explaining and interpreting the standards;

Establish administrative procedures for disciplinary proceedings conducted pursuant to this chapter;

Censure, suspend and revoke licenses and certificates pursuant to the disciplinary proceedings provided for in §§ 62-39-326 — 62-39-328;

Receive applications for state licenses and certification;

Establish the administrative procedures for processing applications for state licenses and certification;

Maintain a registry of the names and addresses of people licensed or certified under this chapter;

Retain records and all application materials submitted to it;

Collect from the individuals who perform or seek to perform appraisals in federally related transactions an annual registry fee in an amount designated by the federal appraisal subcommittee, the fees to be transmitted to the subcommittee annually;

Audit from time to time the experience of license and certificate holders for compliance with standards of practice; and

Perform other functions and duties that may be necessary in carrying out this chapter.

Acts 1990, ch. 865, § 8; 1991, ch. 366, § 10; 1995, ch. 222, § 2.

62-39-205. Fees.

The commission shall charge and collect fees to be utilized to fund activities that may be necessary to carry out this chapter.

Acts 1990, ch. 865, § 9; T.C.A. § 62–39–206.

Code Commission Notes.

This section was renumbered from § 62-39-206 to § 62-39-205 by authority of the Code Commission in 2019.